Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,114
Land surveying; application for registration.

Applications for registration shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the examining board which shall be filed with the secretary of the examining board at least ninety days prior to the examination. Such applications shall contain a statement, made under oath, showing the applicant's education and detailed summary of his or her technical work, the applicant's social security number, and such other information as the examining board shall require.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 7, p. 1334;

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 18;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 221.